Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2115.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 35, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 35-198, to read: START_STATUTE35-198. Use of public monies; administrative costs; limit NOTWITHSTANDING any other law, a budget unit or political subdivision of this state that receives public monies for administrative costs may use not more than eight percent of the total public monies received for administrative costs. END_STATUTE